New York, session 2025-2026, A1136.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Moratorium on the placement of registered sex offenders in 2 residential placements for individuals with developmental disabilities. 3 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there is here- 4 by established a moratorium on the placement by the office for people 5 with developmental disabilities of registered sex offenders, pursuant to 6 article 6-C of the correction law, in any residential placement for 7 individuals with developmental disabilities. The moratorium shall 8 continue in existence until the office for people with developmental 9 disabilities reports to the governor and the legislature on its findings 10 and recommendations as required by subdivision 2 of this section. 11 2. The office for people with developmental disabilities, in cooper- 12 ation with the department of mental hygiene and the department of 13 corrections and community supervision, shall conduct a comprehensive 14 study to determine: (i) the dangers to the physical and mental health of 15 current developmentally disabled residents that may result from the 16 placement of registered sex offenders in such residences; (ii) any other 17 possible implications of placing registered sex offenders in such resi- 18 dences; and (iii) whether there are any other practicable alternatives 19 to such placements. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03435-01-5